District of Columbia statutes.
34-1921.03

Penalties.

Any company or corporation now or hereafter owning and maintaining such poles and wires attached thereto on or over any street or avenue within the said limits described in § 34-1921.01, which shall willfully neglect or refuse to remove the same, as provided in § 34-1921.01, shall be liable to a penalty of not more than $25 for each and every day during which such failure to remove said poles and wires shall continue, which amount may be recovered by the District of Columbia in any court of competent jurisdiction.

Mar. 3, 1905, 33 Stat. 985, ch. 1415, § 3
1981 Ed., § 43-1411.
1973 Ed., § 43-1411.